Florida, session 2026, SB744.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 119.101, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 119.101âRequests for public records made to law enforcement 21 officers.â 22 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 23 (a)ââEmploying agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 24 943.10. 25 (b)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as in s. 26 943.10. 27 (2)âA law enforcement officer who is actively engaged in 28 the performance of an official duty, including, but not limited 29 to, a call for service, an investigation, a case-related 30 activity, or other official police activity, may not accept and 31 process a public records request at such time. 32 (a)âFor the purposes of this section, the determination of 33 whether such officer is engaged in the performance of an 34 official duty is made by the officer. 35 (b)âUpon the determination that the officer is engaged in 36 the performance of an official duty, the officer must verbally 37 inform the individual requesting public records that he or she 38 cannot accept and process the public records request at that 39 time and direct the individual to: 40 1.âThe custodian of records for the officerâs employing 41 agency; or 42 2.âAn official public records request online portal, if 43 available. 44 (c)âAn individual who, after being informed pursuant to 45 paragraph (b), knowingly and willfully persists in attempting to 46 compel a law enforcement officer to accept and process a public 47 records request while such officer is engaged in the performance 48 of an official duty commits the offense of obstruction of a law 49 enforcement officer, in violation of s. 843.02. 50 (3)âThis section does not apply to a law enforcement 51 officer performing his or her official duties at an official 52 location of the employing agency. 53 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.